Florida, session 2026, SB536.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 13 14 Section 1.âPresent subsections (6), (7), and (8) of section 15 874.03, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as subsections (7), 16 (8), and (9), respectively, a new subsection (6) is added to 17 that section, and subsection (3) of that section is amended, to 18 read: 19 874.03âDefinitions.âAs used in this chapter: 20 (3)ââCriminal gang memberâ means is a person who meets two 21 or more of the following criteria: 22 (a)âAdmits in person or on an online platform or social 23 media that he or she is a criminal gang member. 24 (b)(a)âIs identified or claimed by a Admits to criminal 25 gang as one of its members membership. 26 (c)(b)âIs identified as a criminal gang member by a parent, 27 or guardian, or spouse living with the person. 28 (d)(c)âIs identified as a criminal gang member by a 29 documented reliable informant. 30 (e)(d)âAdopts the style of dress of a criminal gang. 31 (f)(e)âAdopts the use of a hand sign identified as used by 32 a criminal gang. 33 (g)(f)âHas a tattoo identified as used by a criminal gang. 34 (h)(g)âAssociates with one or more known criminal gang 35 members. 36 (i)(h)âIs identified as a criminal gang member by an 37 informant of previously untested reliability and such 38 identification is corroborated by independent information. 39 (j)(i)âIs identified as a criminal gang member by physical 40 evidence. 41 (k)(j)âHas been observed in the company of one or more 42 known criminal gang members two four or more times. Observation 43 in a custodial setting requires a willful association. It is the 44 intent of the Legislature to allow this criterion to be used to 45 identify gang members who recruit and organize in jails, 46 prisons, and other detention settings. 47 (l)(k)âHas authored any communication indicating gang 48 affiliation or gang activity or accepting responsibility for the 49 commission of any crime by a the criminal gang member. 50 (m)âUses gang-related language in furtherance of criminal 51 gang-related activity on an online platform or social media. 52 53 Where a single act or factual transaction satisfies the 54 requirements of more than one of the criteria in this 55 subsection, each of those criteria has thereby been satisfied 56 for the purposes of this subsection the statute. 57 (6)ââGang-related languageâ means any verbal or written 58 statement that signals gang affiliation, supports gang activity, 59 or uses recognized gang codes, symbols, or terminology 60 associated with criminal organizations. Written statements 61 include any digital or electronic statements, including 62 statements made on any online platform or social media. 63 Section 2.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 64 made by this act to section 874.03, Florida Statutes, in a 65 reference thereto, paragraph (a) of subsection (2) of section 66 823.05, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 67 823.05âPlaces and groups engaged in certain activities 68 declared a nuisance; abatement and enjoinment.â 69 (2)(a)âAs used in this subsection, the terms âcriminal 70 gang,â âcriminal gang member,â âcriminal gang associate,â and 71 âcriminal gang-related activityâ have the same meanings as 72 provided in s. 874.03. 73 Section 3.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 74 made by this act to section 874.03, Florida Statutes, in a 75 reference thereto, paragraph (n) of subsection (6) of section 76 921.141, Florida Statutes, is reenacted to read: 77 921.141âSentence of death or life imprisonment for capital 78 felonies; further proceedings to determine sentence.â 79 (6)âAGGRAVATING FACTORS.âAggravating factors shall be 80 limited to the following: 81 (n)âThe capital felony was committed by a criminal gang 82 member, as defined in s. 874.03. 83 Section 4.âFor the purpose of incorporating the amendment 84 made by this act to section 874.03, Florida Statutes, in a 85 reference thereto, subsection (11) of section 951.23, Florida 86 Statutes, is reenacted to read: 87 951.23âCounty and municipal detention facilities; 88 definitions; administration; standards and requirements.â 89 (11)âGANG STATUS OF INMATES.âA county or municipal 90 detention facility may designate an individual to be responsible 91 for assessing whether each current inmate is a criminal gang 92 member or associate using the criteria in s. 874.03. The 93 individual should at least once biweekly transmit information on 94 inmates believed to be criminal gang members or associates to 95 the arresting law enforcement agency. 96 Section 5.âThis act shall take effect October 1, 2026.